Arkansas, session 2025, HB1854.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-77-2304 is amended to read as follows:
20-77-2304. Exemptions.
An individual may provide caregiver services without the training
required under this subchapter if the person is a:
(1) Certified Nursing Assistant;
(2) Licensed practical nurse;
(3) Parent, grandparent, child, grandchild, or sibling of the
recipient of the services;
(4) Physician;
(5) Registered nurse;
(6) Service provider who does not receive compensation for his
or her services;
(7) Licensed social worker;
(8) Court-appointed legal guardian of the recipient of the
caregiver services; or
(9) A direct-care worker providing caregiver services to a
*JMB569*
03/19/2025 11:11:08 AM JMB569

HB1854
participant in any program licensed, certified, or administered by the
Department of Human Services; or
(10) A home caregiver who previously completed training under
this subchapter if he or she provides documentation of the completed
training.































03/19/2025 11:11:08 AM JMB569